Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8250.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-7-14.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-7 entitled "Retail
Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-7-14.2. Class P licenses — Caterers Class P licenses -- Caterers -- Distillery off-
premises event endorsement.
(a) A caterer licensed by the department of health and the division of taxation shall be
eligible to apply for a Class P license from the department of business regulation. The department
of business regulation is authorized to issue all caterers’ licenses. The license will be valid
throughout this state as a state license and no further license will be required or tax imposed by any
city or town upon this alcoholic beverage privilege. Each caterer to which the license is issued shall
pay to the department of business regulation an annual fee of five hundred dollars ($500) for the
license, which fees are paid into the state treasury. The department is authorized to promulgate
rules and regulations for the implementation of this license. In promulgating said rules, the
department shall include, but is not limited to, the following standards:
(1) Proper identification will be required for individuals who look thirty (30) years old or
younger and who are ordering alcoholic beverages;
(2) Only valid ID’s as defined by these titles are acceptable;
(3) An individual may not be served more than two (2) drinks at a time;
(4) Licensees, their agents, or employees will not serve visibly intoxicated individuals;
(5) Licensees may only serve alcoholic beverages for no more than a five-hour (5) period

per event;
(6) Only a licensee, or its employees, may serve alcoholic beverages at the event;
(7) The licensee will deliver and remove alcoholic beverages to the event; and
(8) No shots or triple alcoholic drinks will be served.
(b) Any bartender employed by the licensee shall be certified by a nationally recognized
alcohol beverage server training program.
(c) The licensee shall purchase at retail all alcoholic beverages from a licensed Class A
alcohol retail establishment located in the state, provided, however, any licensee who also holds a
Class B license, issued pursuant to the provisions of § 3-7-7, shall be allowed to purchase alcoholic
beverages at wholesale. Any person violating this section shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500)
for this violation and shall be subject to license revocation. The provisions of this section shall be
enforced in accordance with this title.
(d) Violation of subsection subsections (a) or (e) of this section is punishable upon
conviction by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). Fines imposed under this section
shall be paid to the department of business regulation.
(e) A licensed distillery manufacturer, licensed under the provisions of chapter 6 of title 3
(“manufacturing and wholesale licenses”), shall be eligible to apply for a distillery off-premise
event endorsement under a Class P license. This endorsement authorizes the licensed distillery to
sell and serve distilled spirits manufactured by the licensee at designated events, including private
celebrations, weddings, corporate functions, festivals, ticketed events, and other temporary
gatherings approved by the department using a mobile bar unit or temporary service structure.
(f) The department of business regulation shall promulgate rules and regulations for the
implementation of the distillery off-premise event endorsement including, but not limited to:
(1) Event permit requirements;
(2) Insurance and liability standards;
(3) Responsible server training requirements;
(4) Municipal consent or notification procedures; and
(5) Caps or limits on annual endorsements if needed to protect public safety.
(g) Nothing in this section authorizes the sale of distilled spirits other than those
manufactured by the licensed distillery.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005970
========
LC005970 - Page 2 of 3